Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.539

IMPACT center—Director.

The IMPACT center shall be administered by a director appointed by the dean of the college of agriculture and home economics of Washington State University.

[ 1985 c 39 s 3; 1984 c 57 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 39: See note following RCW 28B.30.535.